Hawaii statutes.
§832-10 Rights of accused person;
application for writ of habeas corpus. No person arrested upon the warrant
shall be delivered over to the agent whom the executive authority demanding him
has appointed to receive him unless he shall first be taken before a judge of a
court of record in this State, who shall inform him of the demand made for his
surrender and of the crime with which he is charged, and that he has the right
to demand and procure legal counsel; and if the prisoner or his counsel states
that he or they desire to test the legality of his arrest, the judge of the
court of record shall fix a reasonable time to be allowed him within which to
apply for a writ of habeas corpus. When the writ is applied for, notice
thereof, and of the time and place of hearing thereon, shall be given to the
prosecuting officer of the county in which the arrest is made and in which the
accused is in custody, and to the agent of the demanding state. [L 1941, c 99,
§10; RL 1945, §10640; RL 1955, §250-10; HRS §713-10; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Scope of habeas corpus proceeding to resist extradition. 48
H. 508, 405 P.2d 309 (1965).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next